en: marinade
bg: mариноване
cs: marináda
da: marinade
de: Marinade
es: marinado
fi: marinadi
fr: marinade
hr: marinada
hu: marinálás
it: marinata
lt: marinatas
nl: marinade
nn: marinade
pl: marynata
pt: marinada
sv: marinad

en: mayonnaise
af: Mayonnaise
ar: مايونيز
az: Mayonez
be: маянэз
bg: Майонеза
bn: মেয়নেজ
br: maionez
bs: Majoneza
ca: maionesa
cs: majonéza
cy: Mayonnaise
da: mayonnaise
de: Mayonnaise
el: μαγιονέζα
eo: Majonezo
es: mayonesa, mahonesa
et: majonees
eu: maionesa
fa: سس مایونز
fi: majoneesi
fo: majonesa
fr: mayonnaise
fy: mayonêze
ga: maonáis
gl: Maionesa
gv: sooslagh bwinnican
he: מיונז
hi: मेयोनेज़
hr: majoneza
ht: mayonèz
hu: Majonéz
hy: Մայոնեզ
id: Mayones
io: Mayonezo
is: Majónes
it: maionese
ja: マヨネーズ
ka: მაიონეზი
kk: Майонез
kn: ಮೇಯನೇಸ್
ko: 마요네즈
ku: Mayonez
lb: Mayonnaise
li: mayonaise
lo: ຊອດໄຂ່ແດງ
lt: Majonezas
lv: majonēze
mk: мајонез
mn: Майонез
ms: Mayonis
nb: majones
nl: mayonaise
nn: majones
oc: Maionesa
pa: ਮਾਇਓਨੇਜ਼
pl: majonez, sos majonezowy, majonezowy
pt: maionese
ro: maioneză, maioneza, sos de maioneză
ru: майонез
se: Majoneasa
sh: Majoneza
sl: Majoneza
sm: meio
sq: majonezi
sr: Мајонез
sv: majonnäs, majonäs
ta: மயோனெய்சு
tg: Майонез
th: มายองเนส
tl: Mayonnaise
tn: Mayonnaise
tr: Mayonez
tt: Майонез
uk: майонез
uz: Mayonez
vi: Mayonne
vo: mäyonäd
xh: Mayonnaise
zh: 蛋黃醬
zu: mayonezi

en: 70% fat mayonnaise
fr: Mayonnaise à 70% de matière grasse

en: Reduced fat mayonnaise, Low fat mayonnaise, Light mayonnaise
fr: mayonnaise allégée en matière grasse, mayonnaise allégée en matières grasses, Mayonnaise à teneur réduite en matière grasse, Mayonnaise allégée
it: maionese a ridotto contenuto di grassi

en: harissa mayonnaise
de: Harissa-Mayonnaise
fi: harissamajoneesi
hr: harissa majoneza
it: maionese Harissa
sv: harissamajonnäs

en: chili mayonnaise
da: chilimayonnaise
de: Chili Mayonnaise
fi: chilimajoneesi
hr: čili majoneza
it: maionese al peperoncino
sv: chilimajonnäs

en: dijonnaise
xx: dijonnaise

en: mirin, mirin sauce, mirin wine
ar: ميرين
bg: мирин
bn: মিরিন
cs: mirin
da: mirin
de: mirin
eo: Mirino
es: mirin
et: mirin
fa: میرین
fi: mirin
fr: mirin, sauce mirin
he: מירין
hi: मीरीन
hr: mirin, mirin vino, mirin sirup
hu: mirin
hy: Միրին
id: Mirin
it: mirin
ja: みりん
jv: Mirin
ko: 미림
ms: Mirin
nb: mirin
nl: mirin
nn: mirin
pa: ਮੀਰੀਨ
pl: mirin
pt: mirin
sk: mirin
sq: mirin
sv: mirin
th: มิริง
tr: Mirin
uk: Мірін
ur: میرین
vi: Mirin
zh: 味醂

en: mustard sauce
fr: sauce moutarde
hr: umak od senfa
it: salsa di senape
pl: sos musztardowy

en: Prepacked mustard sauce
fr: Sauce moutarde préemballée
it: salsa di senape preconfezionata

en: fish sauce
bg: рибен сос
da: fiskesaus
de: Fischsosse
es: Salsa de pescado
fi: kalakastike
fr: sauce poisson, sauce de poisson
hr: riblji umak
it: salsa di pesce
ja: 魚醤
nl: vissaus
nn: fiskesaus
pl: sos rybny
sv: fisksås

en: nuoc-mam, nước mắm
de: Nuoc Mam
eo: vjetnama fiŝosaŭco
fr: sauce nuoc mam, nước mắm, nuoc mâm
hr: nuoc-mam
it: nuoc mam
ja: ヌクマム
la: Nuoc-mam
nl: nuoc mam-saus, nuoc mam
ro: Nuoc-mâm
sv: nuoc mam
vi: Nước mắm

en: soy sauce, soya sauce, Soy sauces
ar: صلصة الصويا
be: соевы соус
bg: Соев сос
bn: সয়া সস
ca: salsa de soia
cs: sójová omáčka, sójová omáčka shoyu
da: sojasovs, sojasauce
de: Sojasauce, Sojasoße, Sojasosse, Soja Sosse, Sojasoßen, Sojasossen, Sojasaucen, Soja soße, Soja Sauce
el: Σάλτσα σόγιας
eo: sojsaŭco
es: salsa de soya, salsa de soja, shoyu
et: sojakaste
eu: Soja-saltsa
fa: سس سویا
fi: soijakastike
fr: sauce au soja, sauce de soja, sauce soja, shoyu
gl: mollo de soia
he: רוטב סויה
hi: सॉय सॉस
hr: soja umak, umak od soje, sojin umak
hu: szójaszósz
id: kecap
is: sojasósa
it: salsa di soia
ja: 醤油, しょうゆ
jv: kécap
ka: სოიას სოუსი
kk: соя соусы
km: ទឹកស៊ីអ៊ីវ
ko: 간장
lt: sojų padažas
lv: sojas mērce
mk: соја-сос
mr: सोया सॉस
ms: kicap
mt: zalza tas-soja
nb: soyasaus
nl: Sojasaus, soja saus, ketjap
pa: ਸੋਇਆ ਸੌਸ
pl: sos sojowy, sosu sojowego, sosem sojowym, shoyu
pt: molho de soja
ro: Sos de soia
ru: соевый соус
sk: sójová omáčka
sl: sojina omaka
sq: salcë soje
sr: Soja sos
su: nyegat
sv: sojasås
ta: சோயா சுவைச்சாறு
th: ซีอิ๊ว
tl: toyo
tr: soya sosu
uk: соєвий соус
vi: xì dầu
vo: sojakastõq
za: ciengqyouz
zh: 酱油

en: light soy sauce
cs: světlá sojová omáčka
de: helle Sojasauce
hr: svijetli soja umak
it: salsa di soia chiara
pl: jasny sos sojowy, sos sojowy jasny

en: dark soy sauce
de: dunkle Sojasauce
fr: sauce soja foncée
hr: tamni soja umak
it: salsa di soia scura
pl: ciemny sos sojowy, sos sojowy ciemny

en: sweet soy sauce
it: salsa di soia dolce
nl: ketjap manis

en: soy and sesame sauce, sesame and soy sauce
fi: soija-seesamikastike
fr: sauce au soja et au sésame, sauce au sésame et au soja
hr: umak od soje i sezama
it: salsa di soia e sesamo

en: tamari, tamari sauce, tamari soy sauce
de: Tamari
es: tamari
fi: tamari
fr: tamari, sauce soja tamari, sauce tamari
he: תמרי
hr: tamari
it: Tamari
ja: たまり
nl: tamari
pl: tamari, sos tamari, sos sojowy tamari

en: honjozo
it: honjozo
ja: 本醸造

en: remoulade sauce, remoulade
bg: Ремулада
bn: রিম্যোলেড
ca: remolada
cs: remuláda
da: remoulade
de: Remoulade, Remouladensauce
eo: Remolado
es: Remoulade
et: remoulade
fi: remoulade
fr: sauce rémoulade
he: רמול
hr: remulade umak
io: Remulado
it: salsa remoulade
ja: レムラード・ソース
ko: 레물라드
nb: remulade
nl: remouladesaus , remoulade
oc: Remolada
pa: ਰੇਮੂਲਾਦ
pl: remulada
ru: ремулад
sv: remouladsås